Illinois, session 104th, SB2956.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Weather Modification Act. 6    Section 5. Prohibition on weather modification. No form of 7weather modification is allowed in this State, including the 8seeding of clouds by plane or ground notwithstanding any other 9provision of law. As used in this Section, "seeding" means a 10type of weather modification that aims to change the amount or 11type of precipitation that falls from clouds. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.